Arkansas, session 2025, HB1187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-27-308 is amended to read as follows:
17-27-308. Reciprocity — Licensure by Endorsement.
(a) At its discretion, the Arkansas Board of Examiners in Counseling
may waive formal examination requirements of a candidate who is licensed or
certified to practice counseling or marriage and family therapy by a similar
board in another state if, in the opinion of the Arkansas Board of Examiners
in Counseling, the standards and qualifications required for the practice of
counseling in the candidate's licensing state are at least equal to those
required by this chapter.
(b) The board shall issue a licensure by endorsement for a licensed
marriage and family therapist if the applicant:
(1) Submits documentation that his or her license issued in
another state, territory, or district of the United States is currently in
good standing;
(2) Does not have a disqualifying criminal offense under § 17-3-
102 or any additional state law relating to marriage and family therapy; and
(3) Does not have a complaint, allegation, or investigation
*JMB215*
03-10-2025 10:31:30 JMB215

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 H3/10/25 HB1187
pending in any jurisdiction.

/s/Vaught

































03-10-2025 10:31:30 JMB215